Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-948
Ballots to vote early; election commissioner or county clerk; duties; public inspection; when; restrictions on access to information.

(1) Upon receipt of an application or request for a ballot to vote early, the election commissioner or county clerk shall enter in the record of early voters the applicant's name, residence address, precinct, and subdivision of the precinct, if any, the mailing address to which the ballots are to be sent if different from the residence address, and the date on which the application was received. The election commissioner or county clerk shall also record other information in the record of early voters as may be necessary to aid in the processing or verification of ballots, including such information as the date ballots and related materials were sent to the voter or picked up in person, the date on which the ballots were voted in person or returned or received by mail, or information as to the reason why a ballot could not be issued or sent.

(2) The record of early voters and applications for such ballots shall be open to public inspection prior to the election. The election commissioner or county clerk shall make an entry in the voter's registration record indicating that the voter has voted early in the election.

(3) No record of early voters or application for a ballot to vote early made available for public inspection shall include any voter's month and day of birth, signature, driver's license or state identification card number, photocopy of any valid photographic identification, or reasonable impediment certification included with the application.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 291;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 20;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 49;

Laws 2011, LB449, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 23.
April 16, 2026